Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 372, O.S.L.
2023 (27A O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3-8-101), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 3-8-101. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the "Terry Peach North Canadian Watershed Water Restoration Act".
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 372, O.S.L.
2023 (27A O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3-8-102), is amended to read as
follows:

Section 3-8-102. A. As used in the Terry Peach North Canadian
Watershed Water Restoration Act:
1. "Commission" means the Oklahoma Conservation Commission;
2. "Harmful woody species" means a tree or shrub species that
is rapidly encroaching into adjoining lands and is likely to cause
harm to the environment or economy. Harmful woody species include,
but are not limited to, Juniperus virginiana (Eastern Redcedar),
Juniperus scopulorum (Rocky Mountain juniper), Juniperus monosperma
(oneseed juniper) and, Tamarix ramosissima (salt cedar), Juniperus
pinchotii (Redberry juniper), Juniper ashei (ashe juniper), and
Prosopis glandulosa (honey mesquite); and
3. "North Canadian Watershed" means the an area of land in
Oklahoma that drains or sheds water into the North Canadian River a
waterway or water basin.
B. There is hereby created a pilot statewide program to remove
or eradicate harmful woody species in the North Canadian Watershed
watersheds to be administered by the Oklahoma Conservation
Commission. To accomplish the goals listed in this section, the
Commission is authorized to use the funds available in the North
Canadian Watershed Water Restoration Revolving Fund established in
Section 3 of this act Section 3-8-103 of this title. The purpose of
the program is to manage and eradicate, where possible, harmful
woody species that damage grazing lands, create significant wildfire
risk, reduce wildlife habitat and reduce water flow into the North
Canadian River waterways and water basins.
C. In administering the pilot program, the Commission shall:
1. Cooperate with landowners, state agencies, and other
political subdivisions for removal of harmful woody species;
2. Measure the density of harmful woody species and estimate
water used by those species;
3. Create a study using a parallel watershed with no control of
harmful woody species;
4. Utilize available funds to cost-share with landowners for
expenses incurred in the eradication of harmful woody species by
prescribed burn, biological controls, mechanical removal, or
herbicide applications;
ENR. H. B. NO. 2988 Page 2

5. Develop grant programs with conservation districts, rural
fire departments, and prescribe burn associations for resources
needed for prescribed burns, mechanical removal, biological control,
or herbicide applications on harmful woody species;
6. Bring attention to the problems posed by harmful woody
species to create awareness, demonstrate value to all stakeholders,
and encourage landowners to participate in the program; and
7. Have at least two active project areas in the program, one
above the Canton Lake dam and one below.
D. The Commission is authorized to promulgate any rules and
procedures to effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 372, O.S.L.
2023 (27A O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3-8-103), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 3-8-103. There is hereby created in the State Treasury
a revolving fund for the Oklahoma Conservation Commission to be
designated the "North Canadian Watershed Water Restoration Revolving
Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Conservation Commission from appropriations, federal grants or
funds, municipal contributions, private contributions, and any other
sources, including interest earned from the income in the fund, that
are designated for deposit to such fund or designated for duties
associated with harmful woody species removal from the North
Canadian Watershed watersheds throughout the state. All monies
accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may
be budgeted and expended by the Conservation Commission to perform
the duties imposed on the Commission by law. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2988 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 23rd day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2988 Page 4